Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.852

"Organized crime" defined.

For the purposes of *RCW 43.43.850 through 43.43.864 "organized crime" means those activities which are conducted and carried on by members of an organized, disciplined association, engaged in supplying illegal goods and services and/or engaged in criminal activities in contravention of the laws of this state or of the United States.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 202 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.43.858 through 43.43.864 were repealed by 2009 c 560 s 24.